Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Enforcement.

Sec. 45.75.330.
Injunction.

The director may apply to a court for a temporary or permanent injunction restraining a person from violating a provision of this chapter.

History.

(§ 40 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Sec. 45.75.340.
Presumptive evidence.

For the purposes of this chapter, proof of the existence of a weight or measure or a weighing or measuring device in or about a building, enclosure, stand, or vehicle in which or from which it is shown that buying or selling is commonly carried on is, in the absence of conclusive evidence to the contrary, presumptive proof of the regular use of the weight or measure or weighing or measuring device for commercial purposes and of such use by the person in charge of the building, enclosure, stand, or vehicle.

History.

(§ 41 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Sec. 45.75.350.
Validity of prosecutions.

Prosecutions for violation of this chapter are valid and proper notwithstanding the existence of another valid general or specific law of this state dealing with matters that may be the same as or similar to those covered by this chapter.

History.

(§ 42 ch 101 SLA 1961)